apertium-glk.glk.dix
    <pardef n="ند__vblex" c="negative present/subjunctive for stems with vowels ending in a with a special negative imperative 2sg">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings_1/2pl"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نبه__vblex" c="negative present/subjunctive 1sg/3sg for verb with i-vowel harmony">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نیبی__vblex" c="negative present/subjunctive other endings for verb with i-vowel harmony">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نیشی__vblex" c="special negative present/subjunctive for شوئون because it has an irregular 2sg imperative which isn't built off this stem. See نوشو/ئون__vblex ">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings_1/2pl"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بوکود/ن__vblex" c="preterite (past)">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بوشو__vblex" c="preterite (past) o-vowel stem end.">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-3-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بز/ِئن__vblex" c="preterite (past) e-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بدَ/ئن__vblex" c="preterite (past) a-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="کود/ن__vblex" c="imperfect (past cont.)">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="شو__vblex" c="imperfect (past cont.) o-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l>یی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ئون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ز/ِئن__vblex" c="imperfect (past cont.) e-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l>ه‌یی</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ِئن</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دَ/ئن__vblex" c="imperfect (past cont.) a-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l>یی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ئن</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نوکود/ن__vblex" c="negative preterite (past)">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نوشو__vblex" c="negative preterite (past) o-vowel stem end.">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-3-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>یی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ئون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="بوستن"><p><l>نب</l><r>بوستن</r></p><par n="نبه__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بوستن"><p><l>نیب</l><r>بوستن</r></p><par n="نیبی__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>شو</l><r>شوئون</r></p><par n="شو__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>بوشو</l><r>شوئون</r></p><par n="بوشو__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>نوشو</l><r>شوئون</r></p><par n="نوشو__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>نش</l><r>شوئون</r></p><par n="نبه__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>نیش</l><r>شوئون</r></p><par n="نیشی__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="زِئن"><p><l>بز</l><r>ز</r></p><par n="بز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دَئن"><p><l>دَ</l><r>دَ</r></p><par n="دَ/ئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دَئن"><p><l>بدَ</l><r>دَ</r></p><par n="بدَ/ئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دَئن"><p><l>ند</l><r>دَئن</r></p><par n="ند__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمون"><p><l>اَمو</l><r>اَمون</r></p><par n="شو__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمون"><p><l>بَمو</l><r>اَمون</r></p><par n="بوشو__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمون"><p><l>نَمو</l><r>اَمون</r></p><par n="نوشو__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="گفتن"><p><l>نگ</l><r>گفتن</r></p><par n="نبه__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="گفتن"><p><l>نیگی</l><r>گفتن</r></p><par n="نیبی__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اوسَدن"><p><l>اوسَد</l><r>اوسَد</r></p><par n="بوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اوسَدن"><p><l>اوسَد</l><r>اوسَد</r></p><par n="کود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ایسَن"><p><l>ایسَه</l><r>ایس</r></p><par n="دَ/ئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ایسَن"><p><l>بِیسَه</l><r>ایس</r></p><par n="بدَ/ئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بارستن"><p><l>بارست</l><r>بارست</r></p><par n="کود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بارستن"><p><l>ببارست</l><r>بارست</r></p><par n="بوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بارستن"><p><l>نبارست</l><r>بارست</r></p><par n="نوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ترسئن"><p><l>بترسه</l><r>ترس</r></p><par n="بز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ترسئن"><p><l>ترسه</l><r>ترس</r></p><par n="ز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تَوَدن"><p><l>تَودَه</l><r>تَوَ</r></p><par n="بدَ/ئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تَوَدن"><p><l>تَودَه</l><r>تَوَ</r></p><par n="دَ/ئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تکأندن"><p><l>تنکأند</l><r>تکأند</r></p><par n="نوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تکأندن"><p><l>تکأند</l><r>تکأند</r></p><par n="بوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تکأندن"><p><l>تکأند</l><r>تکأند</r></p><par n="کود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دأشتن"><p><l>بدأشت</l><r>دأشت</r></p><par n="بوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دأشتن"><p><l>دأشت</l><r>دأشت</r></p><par n="کود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دأشتن"><p><l>ندأشت</l><r>دأشت</r></p><par n="نوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دِئن"><p><l>بده</l><r>دِ</r></p><par n="بز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دِئن"><p><l>ده</l><r>دِ</r></p><par n="ز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="سوختن"><p><l>بوسوخت</l><r>سوخت</r></p><par n="بوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="سوختن"><p><l>سوخت</l><r>سوخت</r></p><par n="کود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="سوختن"><p><l>نوسوخت</l><r>سوخت</r></p><par n="نوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شکستن"><p><l>ایشکنه</l><r>شکس</r></p><par n="ز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شکستن"><p><l>بیشکنه</l><r>شکس</r></p><par n="بز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فوروختن"><p><l>بوفوروخت</l><r>فوروخت</r></p><par n="بوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فوروختن"><p><l>فوروخت</l><r>فوروخت</r></p><par n="کود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فوروختن"><p><l>نوفوروخت</l><r>فوروخت</r></p><par n="نوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فَرسن"><p><l>فَرسه</l><r>فَر</r></p><par n="بز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فَرسن"><p><l>فَرسه</l><r>فَر</r></p><par n="ز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نیویشتن"><p><l>بینیویشت</l><r>نیویشت</r></p><par n="بوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نیویشتن"><p><l>نینیویشت</l><r>نیویشت</r></p><par n="نوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نیویشتن"><p><l>نیویشت</l><r>نیویشت</r></p><par n="کود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="هئن"><p><l>بهه</l><r>ه</r></p><par n="بز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="هئن"><p><l>هه</l><r>ه</r></p><par n="ز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="وَورسن"><p><l>وَورسه</l><r>وَور</r></p><par n="بز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="وَورسن"><p><l>وَورسه</l><r>وَور</r></p><par n="ز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="چِئن"><p><l>بچه</l><r>چِ</r></p><par n="بز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="چِئن"><p><l>چه</l><r>چِ</r></p><par n="ز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کاشتن"><p><l>بکاشت</l><r>کاشت</r></p><par n="بوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کاشتن"><p><l>نکاشت</l><r>کاشت</r></p><par n="نوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کاشتن"><p><l>کاشت</l><r>کاشت</r></p><par n="کود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کشن"><p><l>بکشه</l><r>ک</r></p><par n="بز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کشن"><p><l>کشه</l><r>ک</r></p><par n="ز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="یأفتن"><p><l>بیأفت</l><r>یأفت</r></p><par n="بوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="یأفتن"><p><l>نیأفت</l><r>یأفت</r></p><par n="نوکود/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="یأفتن"><p><l>یأفت</l><r>یأفت</r></p><par n="کود/ن__vblex"/></e>
